Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6020.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 Sec. 2222. (1) The ibogaine grant program is created in the department of health and human services to provide grants for certified clinical drug development trials overseen by the United States Food and Drug Administration on the use of ibogaine to treat opioid use disorder, co-occurring substance use disorder, or any 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 other neurological or mental health condition for which ibogaine demonstrates efficacy in treatment. (2) The department of health and human services shall award a grant only to a person that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is located within this state. (b) Has a history of proven research and treatment of neurological diseases and expertise in substance dependence and in emotional and physical trauma. (c) Has a neurosurgery program that has the requisite clinical and research facilities, is staffed by professionals who have expertise in the most challenging neurological and neurosurgical conditions, and is capable of providing the necessary infrastructure and expertise to deliver cardiac intensive care services. (d) Has the ability to facilitate pioneering research and innovation in the diagnosis and treatment of neurological conditions. (e) Meets either of the following: (i) Has a signed agreement with a consortium established under the laws of another state that has submitted an investigational new drug application to the United States Food and Drug Administration under 21 CFR part 312 and has requested a breakthrough therapy designation for ibogaine with the United States Food and Drug Administration under 21 USC 356. (ii) If a consortium under subparagraph (i) is not available to enter a signed agreement, is a member of a consortium established under section 2222b that has submitted or is actively pursuing submission of an investigational new drug application to the United 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 States Food and Drug Administration under 21 CFR part 312 and a breakthrough therapy designation for ibogaine with the United States Food and Drug Administration under 21 USC 356. (3) The ibogaine research fund is created in the state treasury. (4) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from drug development clinical trials conducted by a consortium or from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (5) The department of health and human services is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (6) The department of health and human services shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only for the ibogaine grant program. (7) The department of health and human services shall promulgate rules to ensure that ibogaine is administered only in a manner consistent with the protocols established within an approved investigational new drug application or, subject to section 2222a(2), as directed by the manufacturer of an approved drug if the administration is under section 2222a. (8) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, $50,000,000.00 is appropriated from the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund for deposit in the ibogaine research fund. Money deposited in the ibogaine research fund under this subsection is appropriated and available for expenditure for the purposes described in subsection (6) and must be used in a manner and for purposes consistent with the opioid judgment, settlement, or compromise of claims from which the money was received. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (9) As used in this section and sections 2222a and 2222b: (a) "Certified clinical drug development trial" means a trial conducted in accordance with a new drug application that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (b) "Consortium" means a group created by law for the purpose of conducting drug development clinical trials with ibogaine, including, but not limited to, a multi-state collaborative entity established under section 2222b that includes this state and 1 or more other states. (c) "Fund" or "ibogaine research fund" means the ibogaine research fund created in subsection (3). (d) "Ibogaine" means ibogaine and ibogaine-based therapeutics, including ibogaine analogs. (e) "Ibogaine grant program" means the ibogaine grant program created under subsection (1). (f) "Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund" means the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund created in section 3 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.253. (g) "Physician" means that term as defined in section 17001 or 17501. Sec. 2222a. (1) If ibogaine is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to treat a medical condition, only a physician may prescribe ibogaine for a patient. (2) A physician who prescribes ibogaine for a patient under subsection (1) shall supervise the administration of ibogaine at a hospital or other licensed health facility to ensure the patient's safety while the patient is under the influence of ibogaine. (3) The administration of ibogaine under this section must comply with rules promulgated under section 2222. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (4) This section does not preclude a physician from prescribing and administering ibogaine in accordance with federal law. Sec. 2222b. (1) The department of health and human services may facilitate the establishment of a consortium with all of the following as members: (a) This state. (b) Not less than 1 drug developer or contract development and manufacturing organization. (c) Not less than 1 institution of higher education located in this state. (d) Not less than 1 hospital or licensed health facility located in this state that has capacity to provide cardiac intensive care services. (e) Not less than 1 other state. (2) A consortium established under this section shall permit any other state to join as a participating member if the laws of the other state allow for the state to join the consortium. (3) Before receiving any funds from this state, a consortium established under this section must submit an investigational new drug application to the United States Food and Drug Administration under 21 CFR part 312 and pursue a breakthrough therapy designation for ibogaine with the United States Food and Drug Administration under 21 USC 356. Sec. 7212. (1) The following controlled substances are included in schedule 1: (a) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, the ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation: Acetylmethadol Difenoxin Noracymethadol Allylprodine Dimenoxadol Norlevorphanol Alpha-acetylmethadol Dimepheptanol Normethadone Alphameprodine Dimethylthiambutene Norpipanone Alphamethadol Dioxaphetyl butyrate Phenadoxone Benzethidine Dipipanone Phenampromide Betacetylmethadol Ethylmethylthiambutene Phenomorphan Betameprodine Etonitazene Phenoperidine Betamethadol Etoxeridine Piritramide Betaprodine Furethidine Proheptazine Clonitazene Hydroxypethidine Properidine Dextromoramide Ketobemidone Propiram Diampromide Levomoramide Racemoramide Diethylthiambutene Levophenacylmorphan Trimeperidine Morpheridine (b) Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: Acetorphine Drotebanol Morphine-N-Oxide Acetyldihydrocodeine Etorphine Myrophine Benzylmorphine Heroin Nicocodeine Codeine methylbromide Hydromorphinol Nicomorphine Codeine-N-Oxide Methyldesorphine Normorphine Cyprenorphine Methyldihydromorphine Pholcodine Desomorphine Morphine methylbromide Thebacon 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Dihydromorphine Morphine methylsulfonate (c) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: 2-Methylamino-1-phenylpropan-1-one Some trade and other names: Methcathinone Cat Ephedrone 3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy Amphetamine 3, 4, 5-trimethoxy amphetamine Bufotenine Some trade and other names: 3-(B-dimethylaminoethyl)-5 hydrozyindole 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5 indolol N,N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N-dimethyltryptamine Mappine 2, 5-Dimethoxyamphetamine Some trade or other names: 2, 5-Dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA 4-Bromo-2, 5-Dimethoxyamphetamine Some trade or other names: 4-bromo-2, 5 dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo 2,5-DMA 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Diethyltryptamine Some trade and other names: N,N-Diethyltryptamine; DET Dimethyltryptamine Some trade or other names: DMT 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine Some trade and other names: 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxy-a-methyl-phenethylamine DOM, STP 4-methoxyamphetamine Some trade or other names: 4-methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxy amphetamine; PMA Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4), Ibogaine Some trade and other names: 7-Ethyl-6,6a,7,8,9,10,12,13 Octahydro-2-methoxy-6,9-methano-5H- pyrido (1, 2:1, 2 azepino 4, 5-b) indole tabernanthe iboga Lysergic acid diethylamide Except as provided in subsection (2), Marihuana, including pharmaceutical-grade cannabis Mecloqualone Mescaline Peyote N-ethyl-3 piperidyl benzilate N-methyl-3 piperidyl benzilate Psilocybin 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Psilocyn Thiophene analog of phencyclidine Some trade or other names: 1-(1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl) piperidine 2-thienyl analog of phencyclidine; TPCP (d) Synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of cannabis and synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure or pharmacological activity, or both, such as the following, are included in schedule 1: (i) /\1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. (ii) /\6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. (iii) /\3,4, cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. (e) Synthetic cannabinoids. As used in this subdivision, "synthetic cannabinoids" includes any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that is not otherwise listed as a controlled substance in this schedule or in schedules II 2 through V, 5, is not approved by the federal food and drug administration United States Food and Drug Administration as a drug, and contains any quantity of the following substances, their salts, isomers (whether optical, positional, or geometric), homologues (analogs), and salts of isomers and homologues (analogs), unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, homologues (analogs), and salts of isomers and homologues (analogs) is possible within the specific chemical designation: (i) Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole structure, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 also known as napthoylindoles, with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to: JWH-007, JWH-015, JWH-018, JWH-019, JWH-073, JWH-081, JWH-122, JWH-200, JWH-210, JWH-398, AM-1220, AM-2201, and WIN-55, 212-2. (ii) Any compound containing a 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure, also known as napthylmethylindoles, with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to: JWH-175, and JWH-184. (iii) Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole structure, also known as naphthoylpyrroles with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2- piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted on the pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to: JWH-370, JWH-030. (iv) Any compound containing a naphthylideneindene structure with substitution at the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indene ring to any extent and whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to: JWH-176. (v) Any compound containing a 3-phenylacetylindole structure, also known as phenacetylindoles, with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted on the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to: RCS-8 (SR-18), JWH-250, JWH-203, JWH-251, and JWH-302. (vi) Any compound containing a 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure, also known as cyclohexylphenols, with substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not substituted on the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to: CP-47,497 (and homologues(analogs)), cannabicyclohexanol, and CP-55,940. (vii) Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole structure, also known as benzoylindoles, with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole ring to any extent and whether or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 not substituted on the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to: AM-694, pravadoline (WIN-48,098), RCS-4, AM-630, AM-679, AM-1241, and AM-2233. (viii) Any compound containing a 11-hydroxy-/\8-tetrahydrocannabinol structure, also known as dibenzopyrans, with further substitution on the 3-pentyl group by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkyethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to: HU-210, JWH-051, JWH-133. (ix) Any compound containing a 3-(L-adamantoyl)indole 3-(1-adamantoyl)indole structure, also known as adamantoylindoles, with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted on the adamantyl ring system to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to: AM-1248. (x) Any other synthetic chemical compound that is a cannabinoid receptor agonist and mimics the pharmacological effect of naturally occurring cannabinoids that is not listed in schedules II 2 through V 5 and is not approved by the federal food and drug administration United States Food and Drug Administration as a drug. (f) Compounds of structures referred to in subdivision (d), regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions, are included. (g) Gamma-hydroxybutyrate and any isomer, salt, or salt of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 isomer of gamma-hydroxybutyrate. Some trade and other names: Sodium oxybate 4-hydroxybutanoic acid monosodium salt (h) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine. Some trade and other names: Ecstasy MDMA (i) N-Benzylpiperazine Some trade and other names: BZP Benzylpiperazine 1-(phenylmethyl)-piperazine (j) 3-Chlorophenylpiperazine Some trade and other names: MCPP (k) 1-(3-Trifluoromethylphenyl)piperazine Some trade and other names: TFMPP (l) 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxybenzylpiperazine Some trade and other names: 2C-B-BZP (m) All of the following: (i) (6aR,10aR)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol. Some trade and other names: HU-210 (ii) 2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenol and its side chain homologues. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Some trade and other names: CP47,497 (iii) 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole. Some trade and other names: JWH-018 (iv) 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole. Some trade and other names: JWH-073 (v) (2-methyl-1-propyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-1-naphthalenyl-methanone. Some trade and other names: JWH-015 (vi) [1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-1H-indol-3-yl]-1-naphthalenyl-methanone. Some trade and other names: JWH-200 (vii) 1-(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-2-(2-methoxyphenyl)-ethanone. Some trade and other names: JWH-250 (n) Mephedrone (4-methylmethcathinone). Some trade and other names: 4-MMC, M-Cat, meow meow, miaow miaow, bounce, bubbles, bubble love, mad cow, plant food, drone, and neo doves (o) 4-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinobutyrophenone. Some trade and other names: MPBP (p) Methylenedioxypyrovalerone Some trade and other names: MDPV, Bath salts, charge plus, cloud nine, hurricane 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Charlie, ivory wave, ocean, red dove, scarface, sonic, white dove, white lightning (q) 5,6-Methylenedioxy-2-aminoindane Some trade and other names: MDAI Woof-woof (r) Naphyrone (Naphthylpyrovalerone) Some trade and other names: NRG-1 Rave (s) Pyrovalerone (1-(4-Methylphenyl)-2-(1-pyrrolidinyl)-1-pentanone) (t) Catha edulis; Catha edulis; except as provided in subdivision (u) and section 7218, all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as catha edulis, Catha edulis, whether growing or not; the leaves and seeds of that plant; any extract from any part of that plant; and every compound, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant or its leaves, seeds, or extracts. Some trade and other names: Khat Qat (u) Cathinone. (v) Salvia divinorum; Salvia divinorum; except as provided in subdivision (w), all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as salvia divinorum, Salvia divinorum, whether growing or not; the leaves and seeds of that plant; any extract from any part of that plant; and every compound, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant or its leaves, seeds, or extracts. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (w) Salvinorin A. (x) Synthetic cathinones. As used in this subdivision, "synthetic cathinones" includes any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that is not otherwise listed as a controlled substance in this schedule or in schedules II 2 through V, 5, is not approved by the federal food and drug administration United States Food and Drug Administration as a drug, and contains any quantity of the following substances, their salts, isomers (whether optical, positional, or geometric), homologues (analogs), and salts of isomers and homologues (analogs), unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, homologues (analogs), and salts of isomers and homologues (analogs) is possible within the specific chemical designation: (i) Any compound containing a 2-amino-1-propanone structure with substitution at the 1-position with a monocyclic or fused polycyclic ring system and a substitution at the nitrogen atom by an alkyl group, cycloalkyl group, or incorporation into a heterocyclic structure. Examples of this structural class include, but are not limited to, dimethylcathinone, ethcathinone, and alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone. (ii) Any compound containing a 2-amino-1-propanone structure with substitution at the 1-position with a monocyclic or fused polycyclic ring system and a substitution at the 3-position carbon with an alkyl, haloalkyl, or alkoxy group. Examples of this structural class include, but are not limited to, naphyrone. (iii) Any compound containing a 2-amino-1-propanone structure with substitution at the 1-position with a monocyclic or fused polycyclic ring system and a substitution at any position of the ring system with an alkyl, haloalkyl, halogen, alkylenedioxy, or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 alkoxy group, whether or not further substituted at any position on the ring system to any extent. Examples of this structural class include, but are not limited to, mephedrone, methylone, and 3-fluoromethylone. (2) Marihuana, including pharmaceutical-grade cannabis, is a schedule 2 controlled substance if it is manufactured, obtained, stored, dispensed, possessed, grown, or disposed of in compliance with this act and as authorized by federal authority. (3) Ibogaine that is used for research in an ibogaine grant program under section 2222 and that is used in compliance with the requirements described under section 2222 and the rules promulgated under section 2222 is not considered a schedule 1 controlled substance for purposes of this article. (4) Ibogaine that is prescribed and administered in compliance with the requirements described under section 2222a is not considered a schedule 1 controlled substance for purposes of this article. (5) (3) For purposes of subsection (1), "isomer" includes the optical, position, and geometric isomers.